District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.06

Compensation.

Members of each board and advisory committee shall be entitled to receive compensation in accordance with § 1-611.08, and in addition shall be reimbursed for reasonable travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 406, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3304.6.